Mississippi, session 2026, HB1477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  On and after July 1, 2026, if the rental payment for a safe deposit box in a bank or other financial organization located in the State of Mississippi is delinquent for at least one (1) year, or if the lease agreement for the safe deposit box terminated not less than one (1) year prior, the lessor may send written notice by first-class United States mail, and by electronic notice if the lessor maintains an electronic mail address for the lessee in its records, to the address on file for the subject box informing the lessee that the lessor will remove the contents of the box if the rent is not paid before a date specified in the notice.  The date specified in the notice may not be fewer than sixty (60) days from the date the notice was sent. (2) The notice under subsection (1) of this section must: (a) Contain a heading that reads substantially as follows:  "Notice:  The State of Mississippi requires us to notify you that your safe deposit box contents shall be deemed abandoned and may be transferred to the custody of the state and disposed of by the State Treasurer if you do not timely contact us."; (b) State that the safe deposit box contents will be turned over to the State Treasurer if the rental payment remains unpaid for a period of three (3) years; (c) State that, after the safe deposit box contents are turned over to the State Treasurer, an apparent owner that seeks return of the contents must file a claim with the State Treasurer; (d) Identify any apparent owners of the safe deposit box contents; (e) Summarize the nature of the contents that are the subject of the notice; (f)  Indicate the amounts currently owed for unpaid rent and other lawful charges, and state that the apparent owner will become liable for additional amounts in the absence of timely responding; (g) Provide instructions that the apparent owner must follow to prevent the holder from reporting and paying or delivering the contents to the State Treasurer. (h)  Indicate that, in the absence of promptly claiming the contents from the State Treasurer, the contents may be sold and thereafter the owner's claim shall be limited to the proceeds of sale, less any amounts due the lessor for unpaid rent or other lawful charges arising from the abandonment of the safe deposit box. The mailing of this notice shall be in addition to the notice requirements of Section 89-12-23(5). As used in this subsection (2), "apparent owner" has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 89-12-3. (3) If the rent due is not paid within sixty (60) days of the date of the notice, the lessor may open the box in the presence of no fewer than two (2) employees, at least one (1) of whom must be a notary public.  The lessor shall inventory the contents of the box in detail as provided by the reporting instructions established by the State Treasurer under Section 3 of this act, which shall be notarized and place the contents of the box in a sealed envelope or container bearing the name of the lessee to be held in the vault of the lessor until the contents are escheated to the State Treasurer's office. (4) The lessor has a lien on the package and its contents to the extent of any rent or other lawful charges due and owing plus the actual, reasonable costs of removing the contents. (5)  The procedures under this section shall be strictly and exclusively followed on and after July 1, 2026, and thereafter where the lessor of a safe deposit box elects to remove contents of the box for reasons of delinquent lease payment or other lease termination. (6)  If a lessor removed the contents of a safe deposit box before July 1, 2026, because payment of the rent on the box was delinquent or the lease agreement for the safe deposit box was otherwise terminated, such contents shall be reported to the State Treasurer in accordance with Sections 89-12-23 and Section 3 of this act, and any associated rules adopted by the State Treasurer. (7)  If the lessor acted in good faith in removing the contents from the safe deposit box and following the subsequent procedure for custody of such contents, the lessor shall be relieved of liability as provided in Section 89-12-31.  For the purposes of this subsection (7), "good faith" means that there is no showing that the procedures followed by the lessor in removing and storing the contents did not meet reasonable commercial standards of practice in the industry, and that in doing so the lessor did not act negligently. SECTION 2.  All property removed from a safe deposit box on which the lease or rental period has expired due to nonpayment of rent under Section 1 of this act, or for other reasons, and has been unclaimed by the owner for three (3) or more years from the date on which the lease or rental period expired or otherwise terminated, shall be presumed abandoned and subject to reporting and remittance in accordance with Section 3 of this act. SECTION 3.  (1)  Any lessor who removes the contents from a safe deposit box in accordance with Section 1 of this act shall report the contents to the State Treasurer.  The contents shall be reported separately from any other type of unclaimed property reported to the State Treasurer by the lessor.  The State Treasurer shall create a separate and distinct unclaimed property report form for the reporting of safe deposit box contents. (2) The State Treasurer shall promulgate rules detailing a process for the delivery of contents listed in any reports of unclaimed safe deposit box contents filed with the State Treasurer's Office. (3) Following the filing of a report of unclaimed safe deposit box contents with the State Treasurer's office, the State Treasurer shall determine the date for delivery of the contents to the State Treasurer's office.  The lessor shall receive notice no less than thirty (30) days before the date scheduled for delivery. No delivery of such contents may be made to the State Treasurer by a lessor in the absence of or before an assigned delivery date. (4) If the lessee contacts the lessor to claim the contents of the safe deposit box before the scheduled delivery date, an updated report shall be included with the delivery that excludes such contents from those delivered to the State Treasurer's office. (5) (a)  If after investigation the State Treasurer, in its sole discretion, determines that the property delivered from a safe deposit box has insubstantial commercial value, the State Treasurer may destroy or otherwise dispose of the property at any time after one hundred twenty (120) days from the date the State Treasurer took custody of the property.  No action or proceeding may be maintained against the state or any officer or against the holder due to action taken by the State Treasurer or the holder under this section. (b) As used in paragraph (a) of this subsection (6), "insubstantial commercial value" means property that has a value less than the probable cost of the sale of the property, as estimated by the State Treasurer. (6) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section, any military awards, medals or decorations among the contents of any safe deposit box shall not be sold, but shall be retained by the State Treasurer until claimed by the lessee of the safe deposit box or the lessee's estate or released to a person or entity lawfully entitled to possession thereof.  The State Treasurer shall endeavor to work with any other entities, including other states or federal agencies, as applicable, to locate the person or entity lawfully entitled to any such military awards, medals or decorations. (7) The State Treasurer shall establish the procedures and requirements for the disposition of any firearms and ammunition, illicit, inherently dangerous or hazardous materials, and contraband removed by a lessor from a safe deposit box.  A lessor who acts in substantial compliance with such procedures and requirements shall be relieved of liability as provided in Section 89-12-31. (8) For any property of more than insubstantial commercial value delivered to the State Treasurer under this section, the State Treasurer shall conduct a public sale of the abandoned property. (9) Property received by the State Treasurer's office under this section is subject to the holder's right to be reimbursed for the actual cost of opening the safe deposit box and to any valid lien or contract providing for reimbursement to the holder for unpaid rent, storage charges and any other lawful charges incurred in connection with such safe deposit box lease.  The State Treasurer shall reimburse the holder from the proceeds remaining after the deduction of the cost incurred by the State Treasurer for the sale. (10)  A holder required to file a report under this section shall maintain the records containing the information required to be included in the report for ten (10) years after the holder files the report, unless a shorter period is provided by rule of the State Treasurer. (11)  A business association or financial organization that sells, issues, or provides to others for sale or issue in this state, traveler's checks, money orders, or similar instruments other than third-party bank checks, on which the business association or financial organization is directly liable, shall maintain a record of the instruments while they remain outstanding, indicating the state and date of issue, for three (3) years after the holder files the report. SECTION 4.  Sections 2 and 3 of this act shall be codified in Chapter 12, Title 89, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 5.  Section 89-12-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 89-12-3. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: (a) "Banking organization" means any national or state bank, trust company, savings bank, land bank, private banker, or any similar organization * * * which is engaged in business in this state. (b) "Business association" means any corporation, joint-stock company, business trust, partnership, or any association for business purposes of two (2) or more individuals, whether organized for profit or nonprofit, including, but not limited to, a banking organization, financial organization, life insurance corporation and utility. (c) "Financial organization" means any federal or state savings and loan association, building and loan association, credit union, cooperative bank or investment company, farm credit system cooperative, or any similar organization * * * which is engaged in business in this state. (d) "Holder" means any person in possession of property subject to the provisions of this chapter belonging to another, or who is trustee in case of a trust, or is indebted to another on an obligation subject to the provisions of this chapter. (e) "Insurance corporation" means any association or corporation transacting in this state the business of insurance involving in any manner a person or property; however, this term does not include self-insured workers' compensation groups or associations comprised of members who have joint and several liability for the workers' compensation obligation of the other members. (f) "Intangible personal property" includes, but is not limited to: (i) Monies, checks, drafts, deposits, interest, dividends, and income; (ii) Credit balances, customer overpayments, gift certificates, security deposits, refunds, credit memos, unpaid wages, unused airline tickets, and unidentified remittances; except future and prior dividends made by the workers' compensation groups or associations described in paragraph (e); (iii) Monies deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, coupons, and other securities, or to make distributions; (iv) Amounts due and payable under the terms of insurance policies; (v) Amounts distributable from a trust or custodial fund established under a plan to provide health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit sharing, employee savings, supplemental unemployment insurance, or similar benefits; (vi) Shares of corporate stock and other intangible ownership interests in business associations; * * * and (vii) Bonds, notes and other debt obligations * * *.; and (viii) Outstanding state warrants, and other outstanding obligations of a government or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality. (g)  "Tangible personal property" means any property subject to Section 1 of this act that is held in safe deposit boxes maintained by a banking or financial organization, or that was held in safe deposit boxes until removal and storage by a banking or financial organization. (h)  "Last known address" means any description, code or other indication of the location of the apparent owner that identifies the state, even if the description, code or indication of location is not sufficient to direct the delivery of first-class United States mail to the apparent owner; (i) "Lawful charges" means charges against dormant accounts that are authorized by statute or by contract. ( * * *gj)  "Owner" or "owners" means * * * a the depositor(s) in case of a deposit, * * * a beneficiary or beneficiaries in case of a trust, * * * a creditor(s), claimant(s) or payee(s) in case of other choses in action, or any person(s) having a legal or equitable interest in property subject to the provisions of this chapter, or * * * his the legal representative(s) of such person(s). ( * * *hk)  "Apparent owner" means the person or persons who * * *appears appear from the records of the holder to be entitled to property held by the holder. ( * * *il)  "Person" means any individual, business association, government or political subdivision or agency, corporation, public authority, estate, trust, two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity whether such person is acting in his or her own right or in a representative capacity. ( * * *jm)  "Treasurer" means the State Treasurer of the State of Mississippi. ( * * *kn)  "Utility" means any person who owns or operates in this state for public use, any plant, equipment, property, franchise, or license for the transmission of communications or the production, storage, transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water, steam or gas. ( * * *lo)  "Farm credit system cooperative association" means a farmer-owned cooperative system established under the authority of the Farm Credit Act of 1971, as amended, for the purpose of making credit available to farmers and ranchers and their cooperatives, for rural residences, and to associations and other entities upon which farming operations are dependent, to provide for an adequate and flexible flow of money into rural areas, and to modernize and consolidate existing farm credit law to meet current and future rural credit needs, and for other purposes, and which are chartered by and subject to the regulatory control of the Farm Credit Administration.  For purposes of this chapter, the term includes: (i) Farm credit banks; (ii) The bank for cooperatives; (iii) Agricultural credit banks; (iv) Federal land bank associations; (v) Federal land credit associations; (vi) Production credit associations; (vii) Agricultural credit associations; (viii) The federal Farm Credit Banks Funding Corporation; (ix) The Federal Agricultural Mortgage Corporation; (x) Service corporations established pursuant to Section 12 USCS Section 2211; and (xi) Such other institutions as may be made a part of the Farm Credit System. SECTION 6.  Section 89-12-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 89-12-5. (1)  Subject to the provisions of Sections 89-12-17 and 89-12-19, the following property held or owing by a banking or financial organization or by a business association shall be presumed abandoned: (a) Any demand, savings, or matured time deposit * * * made in this state with a banking organization or financial organization, together with any interest or dividend thereon, excluding any charges that may have accrued, unless the owner * * * has or owners have, within five (5) years: (i) Increased or decreased the amount of the deposit, or presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the deposit for the crediting of interest; * * * or (ii) Corresponded in writing with the banking organization or financial organization concerning the deposit; * * * or (iii)  Directed activity in the account in which the property is held, including accessing the account or information concerning the account, or issuing a direction to increase, decrease, or otherwise change the amount or type of property held in the account; ( * * *iiiiv)  Otherwise indicated an interest in the deposit as evidenced by a memorandum on file with the banking organization or financial organization * * *.; or (v) Had another relationship with the banking or financial organization concerning, which the owner has: 1. Communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization; or 2. Otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the banking or financial organization. (b) Any sum payable on checks certified in this state or on written instruments issued in this state on which a banking or financial organization or business association is directly liable, including, but not limited to, certificates of deposit, drafts, money orders and traveler's checks, that, with the exception of traveler's checks and money orders, has been outstanding for more than five (5) years from the date it was payable, or from the date of its issuance if payable on demand, or, in the case of traveler's checks, that has been outstanding for more than fifteen (15) years from the date of its issuance, or, in the case of money orders, that has been outstanding for more than seven (7) years from the date of its issuance, unless the owner * * * has or owners have within five (5) years, or within fifteen (15) years in the case of traveler's checks or within seven (7) years in the case of money orders, corresponded in writing with the banking or financial organization or business association concerning it, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum on file with the banking or financial organization or business association. (2) Any certificate of deposit made in this state with a banking organization, together with an interest or dividend thereon, with a maturity date equal to or greater than ten (10) years shall be exempt from the time limit provisions of this chapter. SECTION 7.  Section 89-12-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 89-12-11.   * * *(1)  Subject to the provisions of Section 89‑12‑17, and except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (5) of this section, stock or other intangible ownership interest in a business association which is held by the association, the existence of which is evidenced by records available to the association, is presumed abandoned if a dividend, distribution or other sum payable as a result of the interest has remained unclaimed by the owner for five (5) years and during that time the owner has not: (a) Communicated in writing with the association regarding the interest or a dividend, distribution or other sum payable as a result of the interest; or (b) Otherwise communicated with the association regarding the interest or a dividend, distribution or other sum payable as a result of the interest, as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the association prepared by an employee of the association. (2) At the expiration of a five‑year period following the failure of the owner to claim a dividend, distribution or other sum payable to the owner as a result of the interest, the interest is not presumed abandoned unless there have been at least five (5) dividends, distributions or other sums paid during the period, none of which has been claimed by the owner.  If five (5) dividends, distributions or other sums are paid during the five‑year period, the time period leading to a presumption of abandonment commences on the date that payment of the first unclaimed dividend, distribution or other sum became due and payable.  If five (5) dividends, distributions or other sums are not paid during the presumptive period, the period continues to run until there have been five (5) dividends, distributions or other sums that have not been claimed by the owner. (3) The running of the five‑year period of abandonment ceases immediately upon the occurrence of a communication as described in subsection (1) of this section. If any future dividend, distribution or other sum payable to the owner as a result of the interest is subsequently not claimed by the owner, a new period of abandonment commences and relates back to the time a subsequent dividend, distribution or other sum became due and payable. (4) At the time an interest is presumed abandoned under this section, any dividend, distribution or other sum then held for or owing to the owner as a result of the interest, and not previously abandoned, is presumed abandoned. (5) This section does not apply to any stock or other intangible ownership of interest enrolled in a plan that provides for the automatic reinvestment of dividends, distributions or other sums payable as a result of the interest unless the records available to the State Treasurer show, with respect to any intangible ownership interest not enrolled in the reinvestment plan, that the owner has not within five (5) years communicated in any manner described in subsection (1) of this section. (1)  A security is presumed abandoned upon the earlier of the following: (a)  Three (3) years after the date a communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States Postal Service; however, if such returned communication is resent within one (1) month to the apparent owner, the three-year period does not begin to run until the day the resent item is returned as undeliverable; or (b)  Five (5) years after the date of the apparent owner's last indication of interest in the security. (2)  If the holder does not send communications to the apparent owner of a security by first-class United States mail on at least an annual basis, the holder shall attempt to confirm the apparent owner's interest in the security by sending the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication not later than three (3) years after the apparent owner's last indication of interest in the security.  However, the holder promptly shall attempt to contact the apparent owner by first-class United States mail if: (a)  The holder does not have information needed to send the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication or the holder believes that the apparent owner's electronic-mail address in the holder's records is not valid; (b)  The holder receives notification that the electronic-mail communication was not received; (c)  The apparent owner does not respond to the electronic-mail communication within thirty (30) days after the communication was sent. (3)  If first-class United States mail sent under subsection (2) of this section is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States Postal Service, the security is presumed abandoned in accordance with subsection (1)(b) above. (4)  If a holder in the ordinary course of its business receives notice or an indication of the death of an apparent owner, the holder shall attempt to confirm whether the apparent owner is deceased not later than ninety (90) days after receipt of the notice or indication.  Notwithstanding the standards set forth in subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section, if the holder either receives confirmation of the death of the apparent owner in the ordinary course of its business or confirms the death of the apparent owner under this subsection (4), then the property shall be presumed abandoned two (2) years after the date of death of the owner. ( * * *65)  Notwithstanding anything in this section or any other section in this chapter to the contrary, the property presumed abandoned under this chapter shall not include capital credits or patronage refunds offered for payment by nonprofit cooperative electric power associations, nonprofit cooperative water and sewer associations, nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing associations, or farm credit system cooperative associations, as defined in Section 89-12-3.  Such unclaimed funds shall be used for the benefit of the general membership of such associations. SECTION 8.  Section 89-12-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 89-12-17.  Unless otherwise provided by statute of this state, intangible personal property shall be presumed abandoned under the provisions of this chapter if the conditions for presumption of abandonment stated in the provisions of this chapter exist, and if: (a)  The last-known address of the apparent owner is in this state as shown on the records of the holder; or (b)  No address of the apparent owner appears on the records of the holder, and (i)  The last-known address of the apparent owner is in this state, or (ii)  The holder is domiciled in this state and has not previously paid the property to the state of the last-known address of the apparent owner, or (iii)  The holder is a government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state and has not previously paid the property to the state of the last-known address of the apparent owner; or (c)  The last-known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is in a state designated by regulation adopted by the treasurer as a state that does not provide by law for presumption of abandonment or escheat of such property and the holder is (i)  Domiciled in this state, or (ii)  A government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state; or (d)  The last-known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is in a foreign nation and the holder is (i)  Domiciled in this state, or (ii)  A government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state. (2)  Unless otherwise provided by state law, tangible personal property shall be presumed abandoned under the provisions of this chapter if the conditions for presumption of abandonment stated in the provisions of this chapter exist, and if the situs of the tangible property is this state. SECTION 9.  Section 89-12-30, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 89-12-30.  (1)  Securities listed on an established stock exchange must be sold at prices prevailing at the time of sale on the exchange.  Other securities may be sold over the counter at prices prevailing at the time of sale or by any other method the Treasurer considers advisable. (2)  Unless the Treasurer considers it to be in the best interests of the state to do otherwise, all securities presumed abandoned under Section 89-12-11 and delivered to the Treasurer must be held for at least three (3) years before they may be sold. If the Treasurer sells any securities delivered pursuant to Section 89-12-11 before the expiration of the three-year period, any person making a claim pursuant to this chapter before the end of that time period is entitled to either the proceeds of the sale of the securities or the market value of the securities at the time the claim is made, whichever amount is greater.  A person making a claim under this chapter after the expiration of the time period is entitled to receive either the securities delivered to the Treasurer by the holder, if they still remain in the hands of the Treasurer, or the proceeds received from sale, but no person has any claim under this chapter against the state, the holder, any transfer agent, registrar or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder for any appreciation in the value of the property occurring after delivery by the holder to the Treasurer. (3)  The purchaser of property at any sale conducted by the Treasurer pursuant to this chapter takes the property free of all claims of the owner or previous holder thereof and of all persons claiming through or under them.  The Treasurer shall execute all documents necessary to complete the transfer of ownership. (4)  (a)  All tangible property from safe deposit boxes reported under Section 3 of this act, other than money with no numismatic value, shall be offered for sale by the Treasurer within three (3) years of delivery.  The sale shall be to the highest bidder at public sale on the Internet or at a specified physical location wherever in the judgment of the Treasurer the most favorable market for the property exists. The Treasurer may decline the highest bid and reoffer the property for sale if the price bid is insufficient in the Treasurer's sole discretion.  The Treasurer need not offer any property for sale if it has insubstantial commercial value as provided in Section 3 of this act. (b)  Any sale of tangible property conducted under this section through live auction at a physical location shall be preceded by publication of notice at least three (3) weeks in advance of the sale in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the property is to be sold, and the Treasurer shall also post the notice on the Treasurer's official website of at least three (3) weeks in advance of the sale.  If the public sale is to be held remotely through an online auction or otherwise, the Treasurer may post the notice on the website before the seventh day preceding the date on which the sale or auction is held and maintain the notice on its website through the date of the sale. (c)  The sale of unclaimed tangible property is not subject to tax when such property is sold by or on behalf of the Treasurer pursuant to this section. (d)  No action or proceeding may be maintained against the Treasurer for or on account of any decision to decline the highest bid or withhold any unclaimed property from sale. (5)  No person has any claim against the state, the holder, any transfer agent, registrar, exchange or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder or the state for any appreciation in the value of the property occurring following the liquidation of the property as provided for in the chapter. (6)  The Treasurer may proportionately deduct auction fees, preparation costs, and related expenses of sale from the amount payable to an apparent owner when safe deposit box contents are sold. SECTION 10.  Section 89-12-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 89-12-31.  (1)  Upon the payment or delivery of property to the Treasurer, the state assumes custody and responsibility for the safekeeping of the property.  A person, including the lessor of a safe deposit box, who pays or delivers property to the Treasurer in good faith is relieved of all liability for any claim then existing or which may arise or be made in respect to the property. (2)  If the holder pays or delivers property to the Treasurer in good faith and thereafter another person claims the property from the holder or another state claims the money or property under its laws relating to escheat or abandoned or unclaimed property, the Treasurer, upon written notice of claim, shall defend the holder against any liability on the claim. (3)  The holder of an interest under Section 89-12-11 shall deliver a * * *duplicate replacement certificate or other evidence of ownership if the holder does not issue certificate of ownership to the administrator. (4)  Any holder who has paid moneys to the Treasurer pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may make payment to any person appearing to such holder to be entitled thereto and, upon proof of such payment and proof that the payee was entitled thereto, the Treasurer shall forthwith reimburse the holder for the payment. (5)  The Treasurer and the State of Mississippi are protected from liability for damages incurred while the property or the proceeds from the sale of the property are in the Treasurer's possession in accordance with Mississippi statutory and common law addressing sovereign immunity; provided that, the liability of the state or the Treasurer is in all cases limited to the extent of the value of the property delivered under this chapter and remaining in the possession of the Treasurer at the time a suit is filed.  Nothing in this subsection (5) shall be construed to waive immunity granted under Chapter 46, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 11.  Section 7-7-42, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-7-42.  Any State of Mississippi warrant issued by the State Fiscal Officer against any fund in the State Treasury which has not been presented to the State Treasurer for payment within one (1) year after the last day of the month in which it was originally issued, shall be null and void, the obligation thereafter shall be unenforceable and the State Fiscal Officer shall not issue an additional warrant. The State Fiscal Officer is authorized and directed to cancel all outstanding warrants over one (1) year old at the end of each month and shall notify the State Treasurer who shall remove such warrants from his list of outstanding warrants. The State Fiscal Officer shall transfer the funds * * *reflected by the cancellation of the and report the associated payee records for any cancelled warrant to the Abandoned Property Fund authorized by Section 89-12-37 of the Unclaimed Property Division of the State Treasury * * * where the funds shall remain for five (5) years.  After five (5) years, if the funds are unclaimed, the State Treasurer shall transfer the funds back to the original source of funds. This section is applicable to warrants issued on and after January 1, 2000. SECTION 12.  Section 81-5-64, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 81-5-64. (1)  Definitions.  For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: (a) "Financial institution" means any banking corporation, national bank, savings and loan association, credit union or postal savings bank operating in this state. (b) "Safe-deposit box" means a storage container maintained in the vault area of a financial institution leased to a financial institution customer for the safekeeping of personal property that can be accessed with keys, pin numbers or some other security device. (c) "Successor" means the decedent's spouse; or if there is no surviving spouse of the decedent, then any adult child of the decedent; or if there is no surviving spouse or adult child of the decedent, then either parent of the decedent; or, if there is no surviving spouse, adult child or parent of the decedent, then any adult sibling of the decedent. (2) Persons entitled to access in absence of probate or administration.  At any time after one hundred eighty (180) days from the death of a sole lessee or the last surviving co-lessee of a safe-deposit box, a financial institution shall grant access in the following order of priority to a safe-deposit box that was leased by the lessee at the time of the lessee's death: (a) The personal representative named in the lessee's will if an estate has not been opened. (b) A successor of the deceased safe-deposit box lessee, without necessity of administration, if an estate has not been opened. (3) Documentation required.  A person seeking access to the safe-deposit box must provide the financial institution with the following: (a) Reasonable proof of the lessee's death; (b) Reasonable proof of the identity of the person seeking access; and (c) An affidavit meeting the requirements of subsection (5) of this section. (4) Inventory.  After presenting the financial institution with the items required by subsection (3) of this section, and within a reasonable time that allows the financial institution to comply, a person entitled to access to a safe-deposit box under subsection (2) of this section may exercise the following rights: (a) The right to open the safe-deposit box in the presence of an employee of the financial institution along with one (1) other person who is either an officer of the financial institution or an attorney with an active bar license, after which an inventory of the contents of the safe-deposit box must be prepared by the person granted access and signed by: (i) The person granted access to the safe-deposit box; (ii) The employee; and (iii) The third person who witnessed the inventory of the contents. A copy of the inventory may be retained by the financial institution as a business record. (b) The right to remove the contents of the safe-deposit box, subject to the requirements and limitations of this section. (c) The right to cancel the lease for the safe-deposit box after all contents of the safe-deposit box have been removed. (5) Affidavit.  An affidavit required by subsection (3)(c) of this section must contain the following information: (a) The name of the person leasing the safe-deposit box and the date of the lessee's death; (b) The county in which the lessee was domiciled at the time of the lessee's death; (c) A statement that no application or petition for the appointment of a personal representative has been granted or is pending in any jurisdiction; (d) A statement that the value of the entire estate of the decedent, wherever located, excluding all liens and encumbrances thereon, does not exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00); and (e) A statement under penalty of perjury that the affiant is qualified under subsection (2)(a) or (2)(b) of this section to obtain access to the safe-deposit box leased by the individual and the facts establishing the qualification. (6) Responsibility of a person granted access.  A person to whom access to a safe-deposit box is provided under this section is answerable and accountable to the administrator or executor of the estate of the decedent if one is subsequently opened.  However, a financial institution that provides access to a safe-deposit box under this section is discharged and released from liability and responsibility for the contents held in the safe-deposit box to the same extent as if the financial institution had dealt with the personal representative or executor of the decedent.  The financial institution is not required to: (a) Inquire into the truth of any statement in an affidavit presented under this section; or (b) Participate in the disposition of the assets held in the safe-deposit box or ensure that such assets are properly handled or disposed of. (7) Prepayment of fees or cost.  If a person granted access under this section does not have a key to the safe-deposit box and a financial institution requires the services of a locksmith or other contractor to gain access to a safe-deposit box, the financial institution may charge the person granted access a lost-key, drilling or similar fee, or require the person granted access to pay any cost associated with the services of a locksmith or other contractor necessary to gain access to the safe-deposit box.  The financial institution shall have a reasonable amount of time to have the safe-deposit box drilled after payment of the required fee to allow the person granted access to access the safe-deposit box. (8) Interim access.  (a)  A person described in subsection (2) of this section shall be given access to a safe-deposit box before expiration of the required one-hundred-eighty-day period only to remove any will or burial instructions contained therein.  The person must first meet all the requirements and conditions of subsection (4)(a) of this section concerning the persons required to be present and a full inventory of the contents of the safe-deposit box; but no other contents of the safe-deposit box may be removed until the one-hundred-eighty-day requirement of subsection (2) has been satisfied.  The person given interim access to the safe-deposit box must immediately deliver all wills found and removed from the safe-deposit box to the clerk of the chancery court of the county in which the decedent was domiciled at the time of the decedent's death; failure to do so shall subject the person to criminal liability under Section 97-9-77. (b) The financial institution may make a complete copy of any document removed and delivered under the terms of this subsection (8) and place that copy, together with a copy of the inventory and supporting documentation noted with the date of delivery, in the safe-deposit box to remain there pending removal of the contents of the box as provided by this section or other law. (9) Reliance on affidavit.  (a)  A financial institution that acts in reliance upon an affidavit described in subsection (5) of this section without knowledge that the representations contained therein are incorrect is not liable to any person for so acting.  A financial institution that does not have actual knowledge that the facts contained in the affidavit described in subsection (5) of this section are incorrect may assume without inquiry the existence of the facts contained in the affidavit. (b) A financial institution shall not be held liable for any costs, expenses, damages or attorney's fees arising from a grant of access to, or delivery of, the contents held in a safe-deposit box when the access or delivery is under the provisions of this section. (10) Affidavit form.  A document substantially in the following form may be used as the affidavit prescribed in subsection (3)(c) and subsection (5) of this section. SAFE-DEPOSIT BOX AFFIDAVIT The undersigned, after having been first duly sworn, hereby state(s) that: 1. The undersigned makes this affidavit under penalty of perjury pursuant to Section 81-5-64, Mississippi Code of 1972; 2. __________________ ("decedent") died on the ____ day of _________, 20__, and was domiciled in __________________ County; 3. At least one hundred eighty (180) days have elapsed since the death of the decedent; 4. The value of the entire estate of the decedent, wherever located, excluding all liens and encumbrances thereon, does not exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00); 5.  No application or petition for the appointment of a personal representative of the estate has been granted or is pending in any jurisdiction; 6.  At his/her death, decedent was the last surviving lessee/sole lessee of safe-deposit box number _______ located at _____________________________________________. 7. The undersigned is qualified to obtain access to the safe-deposit box leased by the decedent as the successor as defined in Section 81-5-64, Mississippi Code of 1972:  (Choose one) a. The decedent's spouse; b. Or if there is no surviving spouse of the decedent, then any adult child of the decedent; c. Or if there is no surviving spouse or adult child of the decedent, then either parent of the decedent; or d. If there is no surviving spouse, adult child or parent of the decedent, then any adult sibling of the decedent. The undersigned hereby ask(s) the financial institution to allow access to the safe-deposit box of the decedent to allow for the cancellation of the rental contract and relinquishment of the contents contained therein. SIGNATURE AND ACKNOWLEDGMENT ____________________________ Date: ____________________________ Printed Name: ____________________________ Address: ____________________________ Telephone Number: ____________________________ This document was acknowledged before me on __________________ (Date) by ___________________________   (Name of Affiant). Signature of Notary ____________________________ (Seal, if any.) My commission expires:  ____________________________ SECTION 13.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and is intended to have retroactive application.